Connecticut, session 2026, HB05321.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Economic and
2 Community Development shall conduct a study of workforce shortages,
3 workforce development and workforce training availability. Such study
4 shall include, but need not be limited to, an analysis of the effect of such
5 shortages, development and training availability on commercial activity
6 in the state. Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall
7 submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
8 general statutes, on the results of such study to the joint standing
9 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
10 relating to commerce.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
CE Joint Favorable
HB5321 / File No. 63 1

HB5321 File No. 63
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill has no fiscal impact by requiring the Department of
Economic and Community Development (DECD) to conduct a study of
workforce shortages, workforce development and workforce training
availability. It is anticipated that DECD can produce the study within
existing resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5321 / File No. 63 2

HB5321 File No. 63
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5321
AN ACT CONCERNING WORKFORCE SHORTAGES, WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT AND WORKFORCE TRAINING.